Hawaii statutes.
[§431C-44] Mandatory reporting of
fraudulent life settlement acts. (a) Any person engaged in the business
of life settlements having knowledge or a reasonable belief that a fraudulent
life settlement act is being, will be, or has been committed shall provide to
the commissioner the information required by, and in a manner prescribed by,
the commissioner.

(b) Any other person having knowledge or a
reasonable belief that a fraudulent life settlement act is being, will be, or
has been committed may provide to the commissioner the information required by,
and in a manner prescribed by, the commissioner. [L 2012, c 256, pt of §1]

Previous
Vol09_Ch0431-0435H
Next